Wyoming, session 2025, HB0062.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 6-4-101 and 6-4-102 are amended to
read:
6-4-101. Prostitution; definitions; penalties.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Intimate parts" means as defined by W.S.
6-2-301(a)(ii);
(ii) "Sexual contact" means touching, with the
intention of sexual arousal, gratification or abuse, of
another person's intimate parts by the actor, or of the
actor's intimate parts by the other person.
(b) Except as provided in W.S. 6-2-701 through
6-2-710, a person who knowingly or intentionally performs
or permits, or offers or agrees to perform or permit an act
of sexual intrusion, as defined by W.S. 6-2-301(a)(vii), or
an act of sexual contact, as defined by paragraph (a)(ii)
of this section, for money or other property commits
prostitution which is a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of
not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or
both.
6-4-102. Soliciting an act of prostitution;
penalties.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0062
ENROLLED ACT NO. 69, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Except as provided in W.S. 6-2-701 through 6-2-710, a
person is guilty of soliciting an act of prostitution if,
with the intent that an act of sexual intrusion as defined
by W.S. 6-2-301(a)(vii) or an act of sexual contact as
defined by W.S. 6-4-101(a)(ii) be committed, that person
knowingly or intentionally pays, or offers or agrees to pay
money or other property to another person under
circumstances strongly corroborative of the intention that
an act of prostitution be committed. Soliciting an act of
prostitution is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment
for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than
seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.
Section 2. Not later than November 1, 2025 and
November 1 of each year thereafter, the county sheriffs
shall report to the joint judiciary interim committee on
the number of convictions under W.S. 6-4-101 and 6-4-102
within their county and on any businesses providing
therapeutic massage services that have closed as a result
of convictions obtained or charges filed pursuant to this
act.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0062
ENROLLED ACT NO. 69, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3